Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.35
Supplemental motor vehicle, trailer,
motorcycle, or motor vehicle auction dealer, defined.

Supplemental motor vehicle, trailer,
motorcycle, or motor vehicle auction dealer means any person holding either
a motor vehicle, trailer, motorcycle, or motor vehicle auction dealer's license
engaging in the business authorized by such license at a place of business
that is more than three hundred feet from any part of the place of business
designated in the dealer's original license but which is located within the
city or county described in such original license.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 47.